apertium-fub.fub.lexd
LEXICON Noun_ɗe
asaweere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:asaweeje
booɗɗe<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:booɗɗe
ɓokki<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:ɓoɗɗe
ceede<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:ceede
daago<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:daage
dammugal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:dammuɗe
danki<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:dangɗe
deftere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:defte
fayande<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:payanɗe
fijirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:pijirɗe
geene<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:geene
gertogal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:gertooɗe
gooro<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:goorooje
haɓɓere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kaɓɓe
hitaande<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kitaale
huɓɓirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kuɓɓirɗe
huunde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kuuje
innde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:innɗe
jangirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jangirɗe
jaawngal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jaawle
jemma<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jemmaare
jigaawal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jigaaje
jokkere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jokke
jungo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:juuɗe
kare<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kare
kiikiɗe<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kiikiiɗeere
kine<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kine
kobo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kobooje
koombowal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:koombooje
kondong<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kondongje
koroowal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:koromje
kosngal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kosɗe
kuugal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kuuɗe
leeso<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:leese
leggal<n><pl<cl_>:leɗɗe
loonde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:looɗe
luumo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:luuɓe
maayo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:maaje
mangoro<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:mangorooje
ngesa<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:gese
njamndi<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jamɗe
saare<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:ciʼe
suley<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:suleeje
tingyeere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:tingyeeje
tumaatir<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:tumaatirji
tummude<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:tummuɗe
waalde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:balɗe
wuro<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:gure
yiitere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:giite

LEXICON Noun_ɗi
agoogo<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:agoogooji
akootiru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:akootiji
aji<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ajiji
baskur<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:baskurji
bindirgol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:bindirɗi
bukkaaru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:bukkaaji
buulol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:buuli
ɓandu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ɓalli
ɓoosaaru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ɓoosaaji
canji<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:canji
dawrawol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:dawraaji
ɗereewol<n><pl<cl_ɗi>:ɗereeji
gurel<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:gurelji
habaru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:habaruuji
haala<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:haalaaji
jiiba<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:jiibaaji
kanti<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:kantiji
koloba<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:kolobaaji
kusel<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:kuselji
laawol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:laabi
lewru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:lebbi
liingu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:liɗɗi
loosol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:loosi
mbaala<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:baali
mbeɗu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:beɗi
mbeewa<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:beeʼi
mbulku<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:bulki
minti<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:mintiiji
moota<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:mootaaji
nagge<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:naʼi
ndabbawa<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:dabbaaji
ngabbu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:gabbi
ngapaleewol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ngapaleeji
ngeccawol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ngeccaaji
ngewta<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ngewtaaji
nofuru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:noppi
pataakewol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:pataakeeji
pellel<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:pellelji
piiroowal<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:piirooji
puccu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:pucci
reeta<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:reetaaji
sondu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:colli
soorowol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:soorooji
suudu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:cuuɗi
taaga<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:taagaaji
taalol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:taali
tebur<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:teburji
yiite<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:yiiteeji
ƴamol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ƴami

LEXICON Noun_koy
baalel<n><pl><cl_koy>:mbaaloy
ɓingel<n><pl><cl_koy>:ɓikkoy

LEXICON ClasslessNoun
Aaʼi<np><ant>:Aaʼi
Abdullaahi<np><ant>:Abdullaahi
Adamaawa<n><sg><np>:Adamaawa
Alarba<n><sg>:Alarba
Alat<n><sg>:Alat
Alhamiisa<n><sg>:Alhamiisa
Alim<n><ant>:Alim
Alkurʼaana<n><sg>:Alkurʼaana
Allah<n><sg><np>:Allah
Altine<n><sg>:Altine
Asawe<n><sg>:Asawe
Astawaaɓi<n><ant>:Astawaaɓi
Awdu<n><ant>:Awdu
Buuba<n><ant>:Buuba
Jumɓaare<n><sg>:Jumɓaare
Saalihu<np><ant>:Saalihu
Salaasa<n><sg>:Salaasa
Sutura<np><ant>:Sutura
Usumaanu<n><ant>:Usumaanu
Yaakubu<np><ant>:Yaakubu
Zeynabu<np><ant>:Zeynabu

LEXICON Pronoun
mi<prn><p1><sg><subj>:mi
yam<prn><p1><sg><obj>:yam
am<prn><p1><sg><obj>:am
a<prn><p2><sg><subj>:a
ma<prn><p2><sg><obj>:ma
maa<prn><p2><sg><obj>:maa
o<prn><p3><sg><subj><mf>:o
ɗum<prn><p3><subj><mfn>:ɗum
mo<prn><p3><sg><obj><mf>:mo
min<prn><p1><pl><excl><subj><obj>:min
en<prn><p1><pl><incl><subj><obj>:en
on<prn><p2><pl><subj><obj>:on
ɓe<prn><p3><pl><subj><obj><mf>:ɓe
am<prn><pos><p1><sg><px1sg>:am
maa<prn><pos><p2><sg>:maa
maaɗa<prn><pos><p2><sg>:maaɗa
maako<prn><pos><p3><sg><mf>:maako
amin<prn><pos><p1><pl><excl>:amin
meeɗen<prn><pos><p1><pl><incl>:meeɗen
men<prn><pos><p1><pl><incl>:men
mooɗon<prn><pos><p2><pl>:mooɗon
mon<prn><pos><p2><pl>:mon
maɓɓe<prn><pos><p3><pl><mf>:maɓɓe
min<prn><p1><sg><emph>:min
an<prn><p2><sg><emph>:an
kanko<prn><p3><sg><mf><emph>:kanko
minin<prn><p1><pl><excl><emph>:minin
enen<prn><p1><pl><incl><emph>:enen
onon<prn><p2><pl><emph>:onon
kamɓe<prn><p3><pl><emph>:kamɓe
ɗume<prn><itg>:ɗume
ko<prn><itg>:ko
moy<prn><itg>:moy
ndey<prn><itg>:ndey
now<prn><itg>:noy
toy<prn><itg>:toy


# fuh
# disams: min, en, am

LEXICON AdjRoot
peetel<adj>:peetel

LEXICON Adverb
ɗon<adv>:ɗon
too<adv>:too

LEXICON FunctionWord
dow<loc>:dow
les<loc>:les
on<emph>:on
naa<plr>:naa
naa<neg>:naa
taa<neg>:taa
ɗon<loc>:ɗon
ɗon<int>:ɗon


LEXICON Interjection
aʼa<ij>:aʼa
aamiina<ij>:aamiina
af<ij>:af
maadalla<ij>:maadalla
kay<ij>:kay
too<ij>too
yawwa<ij>:yawwa
